siciliano.lexc
LEXICON rscIri3

    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;

    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*issiru #;

    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ia #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*eva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*evu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*ivi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*evi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*ia #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*eva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*iva #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*iamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*evamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*ivamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*iavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*evavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*ivavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ianu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*evanu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ivanu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ii #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ìi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*iu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*isti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ìu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emmu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*erunu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*eru #;

    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

    ! NOTE: subjunctive present is not used,
    ! indicative present used instead

    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;

    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*issi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*issimu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*issivu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issiru #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issinu #;

    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

END

LEXICON Root
    l_finiri:fin+V_IRI rscIri3;
